New Jersey, session 222, S2410.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Commissioner of Education shall establish a two-year Mental Health Awareness Pilot Program, the purpose of which is to address mental health issues prevalent among middle and high school students.  School districts that are selected to participate in the pilot program shall identify and implement innovative methods to increase mental health awareness among students and provide students with coping skills necessary to manage life stressors that give rise to or exacerbate mental health issues. b.    A school district that includes a middle or high school, or both, and wishes to participate in the pilot program shall submit an application to the commissioner.  The application shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (1)   a description of the school district including the number of enrolled students; absenteeism rates; academic performance indicators, including the percentage of students not meeting expectations on State assessments; and the percentage of enrolled students who qualify for free or reduced price lunch under the federal School Lunch Program; (2)   the number of psychologists, social workers, and guidance counselors working in the targeted grade levels in the school district; (3)   an inventory of mental health services currently provided by the school district to students in the targeted grade levels; and (4)   any other information the commissioner deems appropriate. c.     After reviewing the applications submitted pursuant to subsection b. of this section, the commissioner shall select six school districts for participation in the pilot program.  The commissioner shall select school districts in each of the northern, central, and southern regions of the State and shall seek a cross section of school districts from urban, suburban, and rural areas. d.    Two years following the establishment of the pilot program, the commissioner shall submit a report to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1).  The report shall contain information on the implementation of the pilot program and shall include the commissioners recommendation on the advisability of continuing or expanding the program. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.